Massachusetts, session 194th, H2508.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:-
Section 244. YOUTH COACHING BEST PRACTICES
(a) Every municipal recreation department in the Commonwealth that oversees the
operation of youth athletic activities shall establish a best practices curriculum for all coaches
participating in municipal youth athletic activities. Said curriculum shall include, but not be
limited to, online or in-person trainings that promote consideration of youth athletes’ mental
health and the prevention of psychological and physical abuse related to participation in athletic
activities.
of 2

(b) No individual shall coach an athletic activity unless the individual has completed, on
an annual basis, the best practices training curriculum adopted by the municipality.
of 2